Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-9006
Own risk and solvency assessment.

Subject to
section 44-9008, an insurer, or the insurance group of which the insurer is
a member, shall regularly conduct an own risk and solvency assessment consistent
with a process comparable to the own risk and solvency assessment guidance
manual. The own risk and solvency assessment shall be conducted no less than
annually but also at any time when there are significant changes to the risk
profile of the insurer or the insurance group of which the insurer is a member.

Laws 2014, LB700, § 6.